Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1791.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Climate Emergency Basic Income Act.Section 2. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds and declares that:(1) Climate-related disasters are increasing in frequency, severity and impact on vulnerable communities.(2) Many Pennsylvanians, including unhoused individuals, face catastrophic losses from floods, fires, storms and other emergencies but are excluded from existing forms of aid.(3) State-declared disasters demand rapid, unconditional financial relief to support recovery, stabilize lives and 123456789101112131415161718 reduce long-term harm.(4) The Climate Emergency Basic Income Program established under this act will deliver essential income to survivors of disaster in a dignified and equitable manner.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agency." The Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency."Catastrophic property loss." A total or near-total loss of personal property, shelter or possessions essential to daily life, regardless of ownership status, including:(1) Destruction of a house, apartment, tent, vehicle or encampment used for living.(2) Loss of belongings such as identification, clothing, medical devices, work tools or survival necessities.(3) Eviction or displacement due to environmental hazards or official evacuation orders."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Group-based eligibility area." A defined location designated by emergency responders or public authorities as uninhabitable, destroyed or unsafe due to a qualifying disaster. The term includes shelters, encampments, mobile home parks, apartment buildings and neighborhoods."Program." The Climate Emergency Basic Income Program established under section 4."Qualifying disaster." A disaster or emergency that results in a formal declaration by the Governor involving floods, storms, wildfires, extreme temperatures or other climate-related 20250HB1791PN2201 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 events."Serious injury." A physical injury caused directly by a disaster that requires hospitalization or results in long-term impairment."Unbanked individual." An individual who does not have practical or consistent access to a functional bank account or traditional financial services.Section 4. Establishment.The Climate Emergency Basic Income Program is established within the department to provide benefits under this act.Section 5. Eligibility.(a) Requirements.--An individual shall be eligible for program benefits if the individual:(1) Resides in or regularly occupies a qualifying disaster area at the time of the qualifying disaster.(2) Experiences catastrophic property loss or serious injury.(b) Automatic eligibility.--An individual shall be automatically eligible for the program if the individual lives in or regularly occupies a group-based eligibility area at the time of the qualifying disaster. Individual documentation of ownership, lease or formal residency shall not be required.(c) Limitation.--An individual shall not be deemed ineligible for the program due to lack of government-issued identification, permanent address or insurance status.Section 6. Program benefits.(a) Amount.--Each eligible adult shall receive $1,000 per month for a maximum period of six months following a qualifying disaster.(b) Additional amount.--An additional $500 per month shall 20250HB1791PN2201 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be provided for each dependent child under 18 years of age or for a dependent adult with a disability.(c) Payments.--Payments shall be made monthly via direct deposit or prepaid debit card. The Commonwealth shall ensure that accessible options are available for unbanked individuals.Section 7. Administration.(a) Joint administration.--The program shall be jointly administered by:(1) The agency, which shall:(i) Identify qualifying disasters and affected regions.(ii) Designate group-based eligibility areas in coordination with municipal governments, emergency responders and service organizations.(iii) Maintain a Statewide disaster eligibility registry.(2) The department, which shall:(i) Manage application intake, verification and benefit delivery.(ii) Accept applications for the program for up to 60 days following the date of a disaster declaration.(iii) Operate a multilingual online application portal, call center and in-person access options.(iv) Disburse payments and manage fraud prevention and audit compliance in coordination with the State Treasury.(b) Outreach and enrollment support.--The agency and the department may enter into agreements with local governments, nonprofit organizations and emergency service providers to conduct outreach, verify eligibility and assist individuals in 20250HB1791PN2201 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applying for benefits.(c) Joint guidance.--Within 30 days of the effective date of this subsection, the agency and the department shall issue joint operational guidance to ensure rapid deployment and clear division of responsibilities.Section 8. Emergency Stabilization Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Emergency Stabilization Fund is established as a separate fund in the State Treasury. Money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the program.(b) Sources of money.--Money in the fund shall consist of:(1) Appropriations from the General Assembly.(2) Additional funding under subsection (c).(c) Additional funding.--The agency and the department shall coordinate to pursue Federal reimbursement, philanthropic contributions and emergency block grants where applicable.Section 9. Reporting.Within one year of each qualifying disaster, the department shall submit a report to the General Assembly that includes:(1) The total number of individuals served by the program.(2) Aggregate disbursement amounts.(3) Geographic and demographic breakdowns.(4) Administrative costs and implementation timelines.(5) Policy recommendations for future disasters.Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1791PN2201 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627